District of Columbia statutes.
1-1041.04

Residency requirement.

No official elected from any ward or from any single-member district shall be required to forfeit his or her office solely by reason of a change in boundaries which places the residence of such official outside the ward or single-member district from which he or she was elected. Such official shall be permitted to complete his or her term of office, but in future elections he or she may be a candidate only in the ward or single-member district in which he or she resides.

History

Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-87, § 6, 29 DCR 433

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1334.